Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-501
Nebraska Craft Brewery Board; created; members; qualifications; vacancy.

(1) The Nebraska Craft Brewery Board is created. All board members shall be (a) citizens of Nebraska, (b) at least twenty-one years of age, and (c) either engaged in or previously engaged in the manufacture or the wholesale or retail sale of beer in this state or engaged or previously engaged in the production in this state of agricultural products that are utilized in the brewing process. The board shall consist of seven members to be appointed by the Governor on a nonpartisan basis. At least two board members shall be selected by the Governor from a list of no fewer than ten candidates submitted by the Nebraska Craft Brewers Guild or its successor organization. In addition, at least two board members shall be selected by the Governor from a list of no fewer than ten candidates submitted by the Associated Beverage Distributors of Nebraska or its successor organization. The Director of Agriculture or his or her designee and the executive director of the Nebraska Tourism Commission or his or her designee shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of the board.

(2) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, the Governor shall appoint an individual to fill such vacancy pursuant to the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 1.